Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1113
Hearing; notice.

Upon filing the petition, the county clerk, or, if the real estate is situated in more than one county, the county clerk of the county having the greater portion of such real estate, shall designate and endorse thereon a day for the hearing and determination of the petition by the county board of such county which date shall not be less than thirty days nor more than ninety days subsequent to the filing of said petition. The county clerk shall publish a notice once each week three successive weeks in some newspaper published and of general circulation in the county or counties in which the real estate is located and, if no newspaper is published in the county or counties, such notice shall be published in some newspaper having a general circulation therein. The notice shall state the time and place of hearing and the land affected thereby.

Laws 1957, c. 51, § 2, p. 240;

Laws 1965, c. 84, § 2, p. 324;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-2502.